Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6640YH (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 2479 Section 1. Section 321.189, subsection 8, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 8. Veterans Veteran status. A licensee who is an honorably 3 discharged veteran of the armed forces of the United States may 4 request that the license be marked to reflect the licenseeâs 5 veteran status. Upon such a request, the word âVETERANâ shall 6 be marked prominently on the face of the license. Such a 7 license shall be issued upon receipt of satisfactory proof 8 of veteran status pursuant to procedures established by the 9 department in consultation with the department of veterans 10 affairs, or upon presentation of the licenseeâs certification 11 of release or discharge from active duty, DD form 214, to 12 the department at the time of the licenseeâs request, if the 13 form indicates the licensee was honorably discharged. If 14 the license is issued upon presentation of the licenseeâs 15 certification of release or discharge from active duty, DD form 16 214, the department shall notify the commission of veteran 17 affairs of the county of the licenseeâs residence that the 18 licensee was issued a license marked to reflect the licenseeâs 19 veteran status. After receiving notification from the 20 department, the commission of veteran affairs shall initiate 21 contact with the licensee. For purposes of this subsection, 22 âveteranâ includes but is not limited to a person who served 23 in the national guard, regardless of the number of active duty 24 service days served by the person. 25